test/src/morphology/digit-roots_gt-norm.yaml
# yaml test generated from src/morphology/stems/digits.lexc with doccomments2yaml.awk
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst

Tests:
  DIGITS: #
    0+Num+Sg+Nom: "0" # 
  DIGITS_INT_LOOP: #
    13+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: "13" # 
    100+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: "100" # 
    0000005550000000+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: "0000005550000000" # 
  DIGITS_ILLIARD_LOOP: #
    1000000000+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: "1000000000" # 
    300000000000+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: "300000000000" # 
    123456000000000000000000+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: "123456000000000000000000" # 
  DIGITS_ILLION_LOOP: #
    1000000+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: "1000000" # 
    300000000+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: "300000000" # 
    123456000000000000000+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: "123456000000000000000" # 
  DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP: #
    "1,0+Num+Sg+Nom": "1,0" # 
    "314,1+Num+Sg+Nom": "314,1" # 
  DIGITS_DECIMAL_LOOP_FINAL: #
    "3,141+Num+Sg+Nom": "3,141" # 
    "123,345+Num+Sg+Nom": "123,345" # 
  DIGITS_ROMANS: #
    MM+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: MM # 
    MCXI+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: MCXI # 
    CMXIX+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: CMXIX # 
  DIGITS_ROMANS_THOUSANDS: #
    MII+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: MII # 
    MCCCXXII+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: MCCCXXII # 
  DIGITS_ROMANS_HUNDREDS: #
    CXXI+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: CXXI # 
    DXXIV+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: DXXIV # 
  DIGITS_ROMANS_TENS: #
    XIX+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: XIX # 
    XXVII+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: XXVII # 
  DIGITS_ROMANS_ONES: #
    IX+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: IX # 
    VIII+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: VIII # 
    II+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: II # 
